Maryland, session 2025, HB1317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–207.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A CONTRACT EXECUTED
BETWEEN A COUNTY BOARD AND A COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT ON OR AFTER JULY
1, 2025, SHALL INCLUDE PROVISIONS THAT IF THE CONTRACT IS TERMINATED:
(1) THE COMPENSATION THAT THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT
SHALL RECEIVE IS AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1317*

HOUSE BILL 1317
(I) IF 1 YEAR OR LESS REMAINS ON THE CONTRACT, THE
COMPENSATION SET FOR THAT REMAINING TIME PERIOD; OR
(II) IF GREATER THAN 1 YEAR REMAINS ON THE CONTRACT, 1
YEAR’S COMPENSATION PLUS 1 MONTH’S COMPENSATION FOR EACH ADDITIONAL
FULL YEAR REMAINING ON THE CONTRACT; AND
(2) THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT SHALL CONTINUE TO BE
ENTITLED TO HEALTH BENEFITS COVERAGE FOR 1 YEAR BEGINNING ON THE DATE
OF TERMINATION OR UNTIL THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT SECURES NEW
EMPLOYMENT, WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST.
(B) IF A COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT IS REMOVED UNDER § 4–201(E) OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT MAY NOT BE COMPENSATED AS
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.